Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.368

[Art. 36] Governor may prescribe rules.

The procedure, including modes of proof, in cases before military courts and other military tribunals may be prescribed by the governor by regulations, which shall, so far as the governor considers practicable, apply the principles of law and the rules of evidence generally recognized in the trial of criminal cases in the courts of the state, but which may not be contrary to or inconsistent with this code.

[ 1989 c 48 s 35; 1963 c 220 s 38.]